Tennessee, session 114, HB1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-739(a), is amended by adding
the following new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Community benefits agreement" means an agreement or understanding of
any type between an employer and a community group, organization, or other third-
party, other than the state, that:
(A) Contractually binds the employer to fund or provide specific
attributes, services or amenities, mitigations, or anything of value to a community
or organization;
(B) Establishes employment criteria of any type or form, including wage
and hour criteria; or
(C) Provides for or requires the employer to utilize a trade union or other
unionized workforce where the employees collectively bargain with employers for
wages, hours, or working conditions;
( ) "Community group” means an organized collective of people with similar
interests or aims;
( ) "Organization" means a nongovernmental entity of any type, including, but
not limited to, a nonprofit corporation, an organization, a club, an association, or a group;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-739(b)(1), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(D) Enter into a community benefits agreement or any similar legal contract if the
agreement or contract imposes obligations or conditions on the employer regarding
employment practices, benefits, or operations that are not directly related to the
performance of the employer's duties under the economic development incentive;
- 2 - 003044

SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to contracts executed, renewed, or otherwise modified on or after the effective date
of this act.
- 3 - 003044